Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1324
Sick leave; termination.

All sick leave shall expire on the date of separation and no employee shall be reimbursed for sick leave outstanding at the time of termination except as provided in sections 81-1320 to 81-1326.

Laws 1973, LB 340, § 5;

Laws 1997, LB 314, § 20.